test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-Clex_meridud_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - merituđ: # 
    merituđ+V+Inf: merituđ
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: meṛiduum
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: meṛiduuh
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meṛiduvvoo
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: meṛiduun
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: meṛiduuvettee
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: meṛiduv
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: meṛidup
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: meṛiduuvetteđ
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: meṛiduvvojeh
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: meṛiduvvim
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: meṛiduvvih
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: meṛidui
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: meṛiduim
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: meṛiduid
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: meṛiduin
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: meṛiduim
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: meṛiduid
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: meṛiduvvii
    merituđ+V+Cond+Sg1: meṛiduuččim
    merituđ+V+Cond+Sg2: meṛiduuččih
    merituđ+V+Cond+Sg3: meṛiduuččij
    merituđ+V+Cond+Du1: meṛiduuččáim
    merituđ+V+Cond+Du2: meṛiduuččáid
    merituđ+V+Cond+Du3: meṛiduuččáin
    merituđ+V+Cond+Pl1: meṛiduuččijm
    merituđ+V+Cond+Pl2: meṛiduuččijd
    merituđ+V+Cond+Pl3: meṛiduuččii
    merituđ+V+Pot+Sg1: meṛidužžeem
    merituđ+V+Pot+Sg2: meṛidužžeeh
    merituđ+V+Pot+Sg3: meṛiduš                # meṛiduž
    merituđ+V+Pot+Du1: meṛidužžeen
    merituđ+V+Pot+Du2: meṛidušvettee           # meṛidužvettee
    merituđ+V+Pot+Du3: meṛidužžuv
    merituđ+V+Pot+Pl1: meṛidužžep
    merituđ+V+Pot+Pl2: meṛidušvetteđ           # meṛidužvetteđ
    merituđ+V+Pot+Pl3: meṛidužeh
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: meṛiduvvum            # ø
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: meṛiduu
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: meṛiduvvus           # meṛidus
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Du1: meṛiduvvoon          # meṛidoon
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Du2: meṛiduvvee           # meṛidoo
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Du3: meṛiduvvus           # meṛidus
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: meṛiduvvop           # meṛidup
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: meṛiduđ              
    merituđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: meṛiduvvus           # meṛidus
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: meṛiduu
    merituđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: meṛidum
    merituđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: meṛiduččii
    merituđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: meṛidužžii
    merituđ+V+PrsPrc: meṛiduvvee
    merituđ+V+PrfPrc: meṛidum
    merituđ+V+Actio: meṛidum
    merituđ+V+Actio+Ess: meṛiduumin
    merituđ+V+Actio+Loc: meṛiduumist
    merituđ+V+Actio+Ill: meṛiduumân
    merituđ+V+Ger: meṛiduudijn
    merituđ+V+VAbess: meṛiduuhánnáá
    
    
      Verb - teddiluđ: # 
    teddiluđ+V+Inf: teddiluđ
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: teddiluum
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: teddiluuh
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teddiluvvoo
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: teddiluun
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: teddiluuvettee
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: teddiluv
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: teddilup
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: teddiluuvetteđ
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: teddiluvvojeh
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: teddiluvvim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: teddiluvvih
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: teddilui
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: teddiluim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: teddiluid
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: teddiluin
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: teddiluim
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teddiluid
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: teddiluvvii
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Sg1: teddiluuččim
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Sg2: teddiluuččih
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Sg3: teddiluuččij
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Du1: teddiluuččáim
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Du2: teddiluuččáid
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Du3: teddiluuččáin
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Pl1: teddiluuččijm
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Pl2: teddiluuččijd
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+Pl3: teddiluuččij
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Sg1: teddilužžeem
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Sg2: teddilužžeeh
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Sg3: teddiluš            # teddiluž
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Du1: teddilužžeen
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Du2: teddilušvettee      # teddilužvettee
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Du3: teddilužžuv
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Pl1: teddilužžep
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Pl2: teddilušvetteđ      # teddilužvetteđ
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+Pl3: teddilužeh
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: teddiluvvum           # ø
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: teddiluu
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: teddiluvvus           # teddilus
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du1: teddiluvvoon          # teddiloon
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du2: teddiluvvee           # teddiloo
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Du3: teddiluvvus           # teddilus
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: teddiluvvop           # teddilup
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: teddiluđ              
    teddiluđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: teddiluvvus           # teddilus
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: teddiluu
    teddiluđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: teddiluččii
    teddiluđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: teddilužžii
    teddiluđ+V+PrsPrc: teddiluvvee
    teddiluđ+V+PrfPrc: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Actio: teddilum
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Ess: teddiluumin
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Loc: teddiluumist
    teddiluđ+V+Actio+Ill: teddiluumân
    teddiluđ+V+Ger: teddiluudijn
    teddiluđ+V+VAbess: teddiluuhánnáá
    
    
      Verb - ruáˊsmuttuđ: # 
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Inf: ruáˊsmuttuđ
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ruáˊsmuttuum
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ruáˊsmuttuuh
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáˊsmuttuvvoo
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: ruáˊsmuttuun
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: ruáˊsmuttuuvettee
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ruáˊsmuttuv
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ruáˊsmuttup
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ruáˊsmuttuuvetteđ
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ruáˊsmuttuvvojeh
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ruáˊsmuttuvvim
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ruáˊsmuttuvvih
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ruáˊsmuttui
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: ruáˊsmuttuim
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: ruáˊsmuttuid
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: ruáˊsmuttuin
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: ruáˊsmuttuim
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ruáˊsmuttuid
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ruáˊsmuttuvvii
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Sg1: ruáˊsmuttuuččim
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Sg2: ruáˊsmuttuuččih
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Sg3: ruáˊsmuttuuččij
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Du1: ruáˊsmuttuuččáim
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Du2: ruáˊsmuttuuččáid
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Du3: ruáˊsmuttuuččáin
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Pl1: ruáˊsmuttuuččijm
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Pl2: ruáˊsmuttuuččijd
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+Pl3: ruáˊsmuttuuččij
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Sg1: ruáˊsmuttužžeem
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Sg2: ruáˊsmuttužžeeh
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Sg3: ruáˊsmuttuš              # ruáˊsmuttuž
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Du1: ruáˊsmuttužžeen
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Du2: ruáˊsmuttušvettee        # ruáˊsmuttužvettee
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Du3: ruáˊsmuttužžuv
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Pl1: ruáˊsmuttužžep
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Pl2: ruáˊsmuttušvetteđ        # ruáˊsmuttužvetteđ
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+Pl3: ruáˊsmuttužeh
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: ruáˊsmuttuvvum         # ø
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ruáˊsmuttuu
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: ruáˊsmuttuvvus         # ruáˊsmuttus
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: ruáˊsmuttuvvoon        # ruáˊsmuttoon
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ruáˊsmuttuvvee         # ruáˊsmuttoo
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: ruáˊsmuttuvvus         # ruáˊsmuttus
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: ruáˊsmuttuvvop         # ruáˊsmuttup
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ruáˊsmuttuđ            
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: ruáˊsmuttuvvus         # ruáˊsmuttus
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ruáˊsmuttuu
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ruáˊsmuttum
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: ruáˊsmuttuččii
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: ruáˊsmuttužžii
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+PrsPrc: ruáˊsmuttuvvee
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+PrfPrc: ruáˊsmuttum
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Actio: ruáˊsmuttum
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Actio+Ess: ruáˊsmuttuumin
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Actio+Loc: ruáˊsmuttuumist
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Actio+Ill: ruáˊsmuttuumân
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+Ger: ruáˊsmuttuudijn
    ruáˊsmuttuđ+V+VAbess: ruáˊsmuttuuhánnáá
    
